Rhode Island, session 2026, HB7530.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 23-27.3 of the General Laws entitled "State Building Code" is hereby
amended by adding thereto the following section:
23-27.3-100.1.9. Residential energy code applicability for small homes.
(a) Notwithstanding any provision of this chapter, the Rhode Island residential building
code, or any rule or regulation adopted pursuant thereto, the International Energy Conservation
Code (“IECC”), or any successor energy conservation code, shall not be automatically adopted or
required on a statewide basis for one family or two (2) family residential dwellings with a total
conditioned floor area of less than two thousand (2,000) square feet.

(b) For the residential dwellings described in subsection (a) of this section, compliance
with the IECC or any successor energy conservation code shall be determined at the municipal
level.
(c) Any city or town may, by ordinance or regulation, elect to adopt, amend, or decline to
adopt the IECC or equivalent residential energy efficiency standards for one family or two (2)
family residential dwellings with a total conditioned floor area of less than two thousand square
feet (2,000 sq. ft.) based on local priorities, housing affordability considerations, and community
needs.
(d) Nothing in this section shall be construed to:
(1) Affect the statewide applicability of residential energy conservation codes to one family

or two (2) family residential dwellings with a conditioned floor area of two thousand square feet
(2,000 sq. ft.) or greater;
(2) Limit the applicability of energy conservation codes to non-residential buildings; or
(3) Prohibit the state or any municipality from offering voluntary energy efficiency
programs, incentives, or guidance applicable to residential dwellings of any size.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC003618
========
LC003618 - Page 2 of 3